Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1705.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 102. Definitions.--As used in this act--"Flood damage" means damage caused to real property or personal property as a result of a natural flood event.* * *"Natural flood event" means a general and temporary condition of partial or complete inundation of two or more acres of normally dry land area or of two or more properties, at least 1234567891011121314151617181920 one of which is the subject property, from any of the following:(1) Overflow of inland or tidal waters.(2) Unusual and rapid accumulation or runoff of surface waters from any source.(3) Mudflow.(4) Collapse or subsidence of land along the shore of a lake or similar body of water as a result of erosion or undermining caused by waves or currents of water exceeding anticipated cyclical levels.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 207. Website and Disclosure of Flood Risks.--(a) The Insurance Department shall develop and maintain a publicly accessible Internet website that:(1) Includes information about flood risk, flood mitigation and flood insurance.(2) Provides access to available information that identifies properties in a flood hazard area.(b) Whenever real property is leased in writing, and whenever a written lease for real property is renewed, the landlord shall disclose the following information to the tenant:(1) Whether, to the best of the landlord's knowledge, the property ever experienced flood damage. If so, the landlord shall disclose how many times the property is known to have experienced flood damage and shall provide estimated dates of when the flood damage occurred.(2) Whether the property is in a special flood hazard area or moderate risk flood hazard area, as determined by the Federal Emergency Management Agency.(3) Whether the property is subject to a legal requirement 20250HB1705PN2094 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to obtain and maintain flood insurance.(4) Whether the landlord currently holds flood insurance on the property and, if so, whether the flood insurance covers damage to a tenant's personal property.(c) In addition to the disclosures required under subsection (b), a landlord shall include the following disclosure with a written lease:PLEASE READ: IMPORTANT INFORMATION ON FLOOD INSURANCEMany properties in Pennsylvania are experiencing increased flood risks. You are encouraged to visit the Insurance Department's website to review these risks. A standard renter's insurance policy typically does not cover damage caused by flooding. You are encouraged to speak with an insurance professional about your renter's insurance policy to determine whether you are covered for damage caused by floods. If you are not, coverage may be available from an insurance company or through the National Flood Insurance Program.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1705PN2094 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819